Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-505
Loss of certain employee benefits prohibited; act; how construed.

(1) Taking family military leave under the Family Military Leave Act shall not result in the loss of any employee benefit accrued before the date on which the leave commenced.

(2) Nothing in the act shall be construed to affect an employer's obligation to comply with any collective-bargaining agreement or employee benefit plan that provides greater leave rights to employees than the rights provided under the act.

(3) The family military leave rights provided under the act shall not be diminished by any collective-bargaining agreement or employee benefit plan.

(4) Nothing in the act shall be construed to affect or diminish the contract rights or seniority status of any other employee of any employer covered under the act.

Laws 2007, LB497, § 5.